West Virginia, session 2026, HB4205.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of envirnomental protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 22, 2025, authorized under the authority of §22-5-4 of this code, relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (alternative emission limitations during startup and shutdown operations, 45 CSR 01), is authorized.